Vermont, session 2025-2026, H691.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Breastfeeding helps protect infants against a range of infections,
diseases, and serious outcomes, including sudden infant death syndrome
(SIDS).
(2) Breast milk adapts to an infant’s needs, is easily digested, and
contains immunologic and anti-inflammatory components.
VT LEG #385625 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.691
2026 Page 2 of 4
(3) Breastfeeding supports cognitive development and reduces the risk
of childhood obesity, type 2 diabetes, and other chronic diseases.
(4) Breastfeeding helps a mother’s postpartum recovery and promotes
bonding and attachment between mother and infant.
(5) Breastfeeding reduces health care costs by lowering the incidence of
both infant and maternal illnesses.
(6) Breastfeeding is more cost-effective for families than purchasing
infant formula and related supplies.
(7) Breast milk is a natural, renewable food source for infants that uses
fewer resources to produce than infant formula; does not require
manufacturing, packaging, transport, distribution, or additional waste disposal;
and therefore has a substantially smaller environmental footprint than formula
feeding.
(8) While breastfeeding is not an option for every mother or family, its
benefits are significant, and its use should be facilitated and encouraged
whenever possible.
Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 4085 is added to read:
§ 4085. COVERAGE FOR BREASTFEEDING EQUIPMENT AND
SUPPORT
(a) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for breastfeeding
education, support, counseling, and equipment for the duration of
VT LEG #385625 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.691
2026 Page 3 of 4
breastfeeding. The coverage shall include comprehensive prenatal and
postnatal lactation support and counseling.
(b) Coverage under this section shall be provided without any deductible,
coinsurance, co-payment, or other cost-sharing requirement, except to the
extent that such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible health plan from
eligibility for a health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 1911c is added to read:
§ 1911c. INFANT-FEEDING POLICY
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Baby-Friendly Hospital Initiative” means the program sponsored by
the World Health Organization and the United Nations Children’s Fund
(UNICEF) that recognizes hospitals that offer an optimal level of care for
infant feeding.
(2) “Perinatal unit” means a maternity and newborn service of the
hospital for the provision of care during pregnancy, labor, delivery, and
postpartum and neonatal periods with appropriate staff, space, equipment, and
supplies.
(b) Each general hospital that has a perinatal unit shall have an infant-
feeding policy. The infant-feeding policy shall promote breastfeeding,
utilizing guidance provided by the Baby-Friendly Hospital Initiative and the
Department of Health. The infant-feeding policy may include guidance on
VT LEG #385625 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.691
2026 Page 4 of 4
formula supplementation or bottle-feeding, if preferred by the mother or when
exclusive breastfeeding is contraindicated for the mother or infant.
(c) The infant-feeding policy shall be routinely communicated to perinatal
unit staff, beginning with hospital orientation, and shall be clearly posted in the
perinatal unit or on the hospital’s website, or both.
(d) The infant-feeding policy shall apply to all infants in a perinatal unit.
(e) The Department of Health shall develop guidance that is consistent with
the Baby-Friendly Hospital Initiative to support hospitals in establishing and
maintaining infant-feeding policies in accordance with this section.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385625 v.1